Arkansas, session 2025, HB1606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-21-101 is amended to read as follows:
27-21-101. Purpose.
It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to regulate the use of
recreational all-terrain vehicles by restricting their use and utility task
vehicles on the public streets and highways of this state. This law seeks to
ensure the safety and general welfare of the citizens of Arkansas by limiting
*JLL202*
04-08-2025 10:06:41 JLL202

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 S4/8/25 HB1606
the situations where all-terrain vehicles and utility task vehicles are
permitted to be used in a dangerous and unsafe fashion.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-21-102(1)(C), concerning the definitions
used in the laws relating to all-terrain vehicles, is amended to read as
follows:
(C) “All-terrain vehicle” does not include a utility task
vehicle, golf cart, riding lawnmower, or lawn or garden tractor;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 27-21-102(4)(B) and (C), concerning the
definitions used in the laws relating to all-terrain vehicles, are amended to
read as follows:
(B) “Recreational off-highway vehicle” includes a:
(i) Multipurpose multipurpose off-highway utility
vehicle; and
(ii) Utility task vehicle.
(C) “Recreational off-highway vehicle” does not include a
utility task vehicle, golf cart, riding lawnmower, or lawn or garden tractor.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 27-21-102, concerning definitions used in
the laws relating to all-terrain vehicles, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(5)(A) "Utility task vehicle" means a vehicle that:
(i) Is eighty inches (80") or less in width;
(ii) Travels on four (4) or more low-pressure tires;
(iii) Has a steering wheel;
(iv) Has non-straddle seating;
(v) Has a rollover protection system;
(vi) Is designed for or capable of travel over
unimproved terrain; and
(B) "Utility task vehicle" does not include an all-terrain
vehicle, a golf cart, a riding lawnmower, or a lawn or garden tractor.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code §§ 27-21-103 and 27-21-104 are amended to
read as follows:
27-21-103. Construction.
04-08-2025 10:06:41 JLL202

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 S4/8/25 HB1606
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an all-terrain
vehicle or a utility task vehicle to be registered as a motor vehicle,
motorcycle, or motor-driven cycle for operation on the public streets and
highways.

27-21-104. Penalty.
Any A person violating the provisions of this chapter shall be upon
conviction is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof
shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more
than fifty dollars ($50.00) or imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or
shall be both fined and imprisoned.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 27-21-107, concerning the operation of all-
terrain vehicles, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(c) An operator of a utility task vehicle that is travelling on a
public street or highway as authorized under § 27-21-111(a)(2) shall:
(1) Have a valid driver's license;
(2) Be subject to the restrictions stated in § 27-16-804;
(3) Register the utility task vehicle under § 27-14-701 et seq.
and display the registration decal for the utility task vehicle on the
driver's side roll bar of the utility task vehicle;
(4) Maintain insurance that meets the requirements for private
passenger motor vehicles under § 23-89-201 et seq.;
(5) Carry proof of insurance covering the utility task vehicle
as required under the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, § 27-19-101 et
seq. and § 27-22-101 et seq.; and
(6) Comply with the rules of the road as provided under § 27-51-
101 et seq.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 27-21-108, concerning the equipment
required for all-terrain vehicles, is amended to add an additional subsection
to read as follows:
(c) A utility task vehicle operated on a public street or highway as
authorized under § 27-21-111(a)(2) shall have the following functional
equipment:
04-08-2025 10:06:41 JLL202

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 S4/8/25 HB1606
(1) At least two (2) headlamps;
(2) Rear-facing turn signals;
(3) At least one (1) brake light; and
(4) Seatbelts.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 21, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-21-111. Operation of utility task vehicle on designated public
streets and highways.
(a) A person may operate a utility task vehicle on a public street or
highway of this state if:
(1) The utility task vehicle is being operated on the public
street or highway under a condition or circumstance listed in § 27-21-106(a);
or
(2) The following requirements are met:
(A) The public street or highway has been designated as
being open to the operation of a utility task vehicle under this section; and
(B) The utility task vehicle and the operator of the
utility task vehicle meet the requirements of this chapter.
(b)(1)(A) The governing body of the city in which a public street or
highway is located may adopt an ordinance designating the public street or
highway within the jurisdiction of the city as being open to the operation of
a utility task vehicle.
(B) An ordinance adopted under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of
this section:
(i) May apply to all public streets and highways
within the boundaries of the city; or
(ii)(a) If the ordinance does not apply to all
public streets and highways within the boundaries of the city, shall include
a map depicting and a list identifying the particular public streets and
highways that are designated as being open to the operation of a utility task
vehicle.
(b) The map required under subdivision
(b)(1)(B)(ii)(a) of this section shall be attached as an exhibit to the
ordinance on file with the city clerk.
(2)(A) The county judge of the county in which a public street
04-08-2025 10:06:41 JLL202

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 S4/8/25 HB1606
or highway is located may issue an executive order designating the public
street or highway within the jurisdiction of the county as being open to the
operation of a utility task vehicle.
(B) An executive order issued under subdivision (b)(2)(A)
of this section:
(i) May apply to all public streets and highways
within the boundaries of the county; or
(ii)(a) If the executive order does not apply to all
public streets and highways within the boundaries of the county, shall have
attached as an exhibit a map depicting and a list identifying the particular
public streets and highways that are designated as being open to the
operation of a utility task vehicle.
(b) The map required under subdivision
(b)(2)(B)(ii)(a) of this section shall be attached as an exhibit to the
executive order on file with the county clerk.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a
state highway that is located within an area that has been designated as
being open under this subsection is open to the operation of a utility task
vehicle.
(c) If a public street or highway is subject to the jurisdiction of
both a city and a county, the city ordinance or the executive order of the
county judge that is least restrictive to the operation of a utility task
vehicle applies.
(d) The governing body of a city or the county judge of a county shall
not designate a public street or highway within the jurisdiction of the city
or county as being open to the operation of a utility task vehicle under this
subsection if the public street or highway:
(A) Has a posted speed limit that exceeds fifty-five miles
per hour (55 m.p.h.);
(B) Is a divided four-lane highway; or
(C) Is located in a state park.

/s/Steimel



04-08-2025 10:06:41 JLL202